Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1905
Surveyor; interest; disqualification; who may act.

Whenever a survey of any lands or lots is required, in which the county surveyor is interested, such survey may be made by the surveyor of another county in like manner and to the same effect as though such survey had been made by the surveyor of the county where the land is situated. The surveyor doing the work shall record the field notes of said survey in the official record of surveys of the county wherein the land is situated.

Laws 1913, c. 43, § 3, p. 142;

R.S.1913, § 5689;

C.S.1922, § 5019;

C.S.1929, § 26-1605;

R.S.1943, § 23-1905.